Utah statutes.
53-2a-403.   Authority of governor to join compact.

The governor of Utah is authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states joining the Emergency Management Assistance Compact as provided in Section 53-2a-402.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

